Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-604.03
Division of Public Health of Department of Health and Human Services; survey and certification agency for medicaid program; notice of violation; duties.

The Division of Public Health of the Department of Health and Human Services is hereby authorized to act as the survey and certification agency for the medicaid program and to enter into such agreements as may be necessary to carry out its duties. On and after July 1, 2007, the division shall notify the medicaid program of any violation by a nursing facility, as defined in section 71-2097, of federal regulations for participation in the medicaid program. Civil penalties will be determined pursuant to sections 71-2097 to 71-20,101.

Laws 1989, LB 344, § 15;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 845;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 77;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 734.